Connecticut, session 2026, SB00403.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) As used in this section and
sections 2 to 11, inclusive, of this act:
(1) "Covered entity" means any business, health care entity or
government contractor operating in the state that maintains or possesses
sensitive data or operates critical infrastructure;
(2) "AAL3 identity assurance" means authentication requiring high-
confidence identity proofing and forensic-grade verification of identity
credentials that resists impersonation, replay and credential
compromise;
(3) "Non-repudiation" means a security state in which no party to a
transaction can deny the validity of such transaction or a corresponding
access log; and
(4) "Material security deficiency" means a systemic failure to maintain
cybersecurity standards that poses a foreseeable risk to public safety or
LCO No. 2691 1 of 6

Raised Bill No. 403
operational continuity.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) Notwithstanding any
provision of the general statutes, on and after July 1, 2027, any covered
entity that maintains a cybersecurity program in compliance with the
"Cybersecurity Framework 2.0" published by the National Institute of
Standards and Technology and AAL3 identity assurance standards shall
be deemed in compliance with all applicable state laws and regulations
that establish equivalent cybersecurity requirements.
(b) Not later than July 1, 2027, each critical infrastructure entity shall
utilize decentralized security architectures that provide non-
repudiation functions and eliminate centrally stored passwords or
biometrics.
Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) No employer shall
discharge, discipline or otherwise penalize or threaten an employee
who is a cybersecurity professional because such employee, or a person
acting on behalf of such employee, reports a material security deficiency
or a failure to maintain non-repudiation standards to a supervisor or the
Division of Emergency Management and Homeland Security within the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection.
(b) The protections provided under subsection (a) of this section shall
be in addition to any protections provided under section 31-51m of the
general statutes.
Sec. 4. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) Not later than seventy-two
hours after a covered entity discovers a cybersecurity incident resulting
in unauthorized access to sensitive data, disruption of public services or
operational continuity or material risk to such critical entity's sensitive
data, critical infrastructure, public services or operational continuity, the
covered entity shall notify the Division of Emergency Management and
Homeland Security within the Department of Emergency Services and
Public Protection.
LCO No. 2691 2 of 6

Raised Bill No. 403
(b) The notification shall include, to the extent known by the covered
entity: (1) A description of the nature and scope of the cybersecurity
incident, (2) a description of the affected systems, networks or data, (3)
an estimate of the duration of the cybersecurity incident, and (4) an
assessment of any impact on the covered entity's operations, financial
effects or public impact.
(c) The covered entity shall provide supplemental notice to the
division as additional information becomes available.
Sec. 5. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) On and after January 1, 2027,
each covered entity shall implement and maintain minimum
cybersecurity safeguards consistent with "cybersecurity framework"
principles published by the National Institute of Standards and
Technology, including, but not necessarily limited to:
(1) The timely installation of critical security patches and system
updates;
(2) The encryption of sensitive data at rest and in transit;
(3) The implementation of backup systems capable of restoring
operations in the event of a ransomware incident or system
compromise; and
(4) A cybersecurity risk assessment conducted at least annually.
Sec. 6. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) On and after January 1,
2028, each critical infrastructure entity, health care provider, financial
institution and state agency shall adopt a quantum-transition readiness
posture, including, but not necessarily limited to, planning for
migration toward post-quantum cryptography approved by the
National Institute of Standards and Technology.
(b) On and after January 1, 2028, such entities, providers, institutions
and agencies shall implement cryptographic agility architectures
capable of rapid algorithm replacement in accordance with nationally
LCO No. 2691 3 of 6

Raised Bill No. 403
recognized standards.
Sec. 7. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) There is established the
"Connecticut Cybersecurity Seed Fund" grant program. The Deputy
Commissioner of the Division of Emergency Management and
Homeland Security within the Department of Emergency Services and
Public Protection shall administer the program. Pursuant to such
program, the deputy commissioner shall provide grants-in-aid for the
establishment of decentralized and non-repudiated security solutions
by entities based in the state. An entity may submit an application for a
grant under this section in a form and manner prescribed by the deputy
commissioner. Not later than January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter,
the deputy commissioner shall submit a report on the program to the
joint standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to public safety and security in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
Sec. 8. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Not later than January 1, 2028,
the Division of Emergency Management and Homeland Security within
the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection shall
establish a "bug bounty" program. Pursuant to such program, vetted
security researchers shall be authorized to identify cybersecurity
vulnerabilities in designated state-owned systems. Researchers
operating in good faith within the scope of the program shall be immune
from any liability, civil or criminal, which might otherwise be incurred
or imposed.
Sec. 9. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) The Connecticut Intelligence
Center within the Division of Emergency Management and Homeland
100 Security within the Department of Emergency Services and Public
101 Protection shall collect and disseminate cybersecurity intelligence on
102 behalf of the state.
103 Sec. 10. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) There is established a
104 State Cybersecurity Intelligence Task Force to analyze cybersecurity
LCO No. 2691 4 of 6

Raised Bill No. 403
105 intelligence matters, coordinate actions relating to cybersecurity and
106 identify systemic cybersecurity risks.
107 (b) The task force shall consist of the following members:
108 (1) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection,
109 or the commissioner's designee;
110 (2) The Commissioner of Administrative Services, or the
111 commissioner's designee;
112 (3) The Adjutant General of the Military Department, or the Adjutant
113 General's designee; and
114 (4) The Deputy Commissioner of the Division of Emergency
115 Management and Homeland Security within the Department of
116 Emergency Services and Public Protection, or the deputy
117 commissioner's designee.
118 (c) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection
119 shall select the chairpersons of the task force from among the members
120 of the task force. Such chairpersons shall schedule the first meeting of
121 the task force, which shall be held not later than December 1, 2026.
122 (d) The task force shall meet not less than quarterly and shall report
123 its findings and recommendations to the joint standing committee of the
124 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public safety
125 and security in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
126 general statutes as the task force deems appropriate.
127 Sec. 11. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) The Division of
128 Emergency Management and Homeland Security within the
129 Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection shall
130 coordinate the state's operational response to cybersecurity
131 emergencies.
132 (b) The Deputy Commissioner of the Division of Emergency
LCO No. 2691 5 of 6

Raised Bill No. 403
133 Management and Homeland Security within the Department of
134 Emergency Services and Public Protection, or the deputy
135 commissioner's designee, shall serve as the primary liaison between the
136 State Cybersecurity Intelligence Task Force established pursuant to
137 section 10 of this act and local emergency management directors.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 5 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 6 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 7 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 8 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 9 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 10 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 11 October 1, 2026 New section